District of Columbia statutes.
1-1506.02

Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1983

(Effective March 31, 1983).Statute text

CONSOLIDATION OF MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION PROCESS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

I.

Purpose

The purpose of the reorganization is to consolidate the motor vehicle registration process, exclusive of cash collections, within the Department of Transportation.

II.

Functions

1) Those duties and functions of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia relating to the recordation of liens on motor vehicles and trailers, pursuant to "An Act to provide for the recording and releasing of liens by entries on certificates of titles for motor vehicles and trailers," as amended (D.C. Code, sec. 50-1201 et seq., 2001 Ed.), exclusive of the collection of fees for the same, delegated pursuant to paragraph A of Part IV of Organization Order No. 101 - Replacement, Commissioners' Order No. 63-197, dated January 24, 1963, as amended, are hereby transferred to the Department of Transportation.

2) The duties and functions of the Recorder of Deeds of the District of Columbia relating to the collection of fees for the recordation of liens on motor vehicles and trailers, delegated pursuant to paragraph A of Part IV of Organization Order No. 101; Replacement, Commissioners' Order No. 63-197, dated January 24, 1963, as amended, are hereby transferred to the Office of the D.C. Treasurer.

3) The duties and functions of the Department of Finance and Revenue relating to the solicitation of information from every applicant for a certificate of title, the determination of the fair market value of a motor vehicle or trailer, and the imposition of an excise tax for the issuance of every original certificate of title for a motor vehicle or trailer, pursuant to the District of Columbia Traffic Act, 1925, (D.C. Code, sec. 50-2201.03(j)(1) and (2), 2001 Ed.), delegated pursuant to Commissioners' Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, as amended, are hereby transferred to the Department of Transportation.

III.

Transfers

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available relating to the duties and functions in parts II(1) and (3) above are hereby transferred to the Department of Transportation. Those relating to part II(2) above are hereby transferred to the Office of the D.C. Treasurer.

IV.

Organization

The Director of the Department of Transportation is authorized to organize the personnel and property transferred herein within any organizational unit of the Department as the Director deems appropriate.

V.

Effective Date

The provisions of this Plan shall become effective pursuant to the requirement of Section 422(12) of Public Law 93-198, or on a date thereafter to be designated pursuant to an Executive Order of the Mayor.

2001 Ed., Title 1, Chapter 15, Subchapter VI, Part B.